Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.370

Signatures on petitions, ballots, objections—Determining sufficiency.

Wherever herein petitions, ballots or objections are required to be signed by the owners of property, the following rules shall govern the sufficiency thereof: (1) The signature of the record owner as determined by the records of the county auditor shall be sufficient without the signature of his or her spouse; (2) in the case of mortgaged property, the signature of the mortgagor shall be sufficient; (3) in the case of property purchased on contract the signature of the contract purchaser shall be deemed sufficient; (4) any officer of a corporation owning land in the district duly authorized to execute deeds or encumbrances on behalf of the corporation may sign on behalf of such corporation: PROVIDED, That there shall be attached to the ballot or petition a certified excerpt from the bylaws showing such authority; (5) if any property in the district stands in the name of a deceased person or any person for whom a guardian has been appointed, the signature of the executor, administrator or guardian as the case may be shall be equivalent to the signature of the owner of the property.

[ 1963 c 84 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.370. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 37.]